California, session 20252026, AB1598.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4980.01 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.01. (a) This chapter shall not be construed to constrict, limit, or withdraw the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991)), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)), the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act (Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10)), or the Psychology Licensing Law (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900)).(b) This chapter shall not apply to any person who is admitted to practice law in the state, or a physician and surgeon who provides counseling services as part of their professional practice.(c) This chapter shall not apply to any priest, rabbi, imam, or minister of the gospel, or other religious official of any denomination when providing faith-based counseling services as part of their regular professional duties for an established and legally recognizable faith-based entity, such as a church, synagogue, mosque, or other recognized religious organization, provided that all of the following criteria are met:(1) The services are performed solely under the direct auspices of that faith-based entity.(2) A separate fee, beyond their customary compensation from that faith-based entity, is not charged or received.(3) They do not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “psychosocial,” “psychotherapy,” or “marriage and family therapist,” and shall not state or imply that they are licensed or registered to practice marriage and family therapy.(4) The services provided are limited to counseling services provided in a religious or spiritual context and do not involve the diagnosis or treatment of mental health disorders. (d) This chapter shall not apply to an unlicensed or unregistered employee or volunteer working in a governmental entity, a school, a college, a university, or an institution that is both nonprofit and charitable if both of the following apply:(1) The work of the employee or volunteer is performed under the oversight and direction of the entity.(2) (A) On and after July 1, 2020, the employee or volunteer provides a client, prior to initiating psychotherapy services or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, a notice written in at least 12-point type that is in substantially the following form:NOTICE TO CLIENTSThe (name of office or unit) of the (name of agency) receives and responds to complaints regarding the practice of psychotherapy by any unlicensed or unregistered practitioner providing services at (name of agency). To file a complaint, contact (telephone number, email address, internet website, or mailing address of agency).The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided by individuals licensed and registered by the board. If you have a complaint and are unsure if your practitioner is licensed or registered, please contact the Board of Behavioral Sciences at 916-574-7830 for assistance or utilize the board’s online license verification feature by visiting www.bbs.ca.gov.(B) The delivery of the notice described in subparagraph (A) to the client shall be documented.(e) A marriage and family therapist licensed under this chapter is a licentiate for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 805, and thus is a health care provider subject to the provisions of Section 2290.5 pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (d), all persons registered as associates or licensed under this chapter shall not be exempt from this chapter or the jurisdiction of the board.SEC. 2. Section 4980.397 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.397. (a) A registrant or an applicant for licensure as a marriage and family therapist shall pass the following two examinations as prescribed by the board:(1) A California law and ethics examination.(2) A clinical examination administered by the board or by a public or private organization, as specified by the board in regulations.(b) The board shall grant eligibility to take the California law and ethics examination upon approval of an application for registration or an application for licensure, and submission of the required application and fee.(c) The board may grant an applicant for licensure eligibility to take the clinical examination only upon meeting all of the following requirements:(1) Completion of all required supervised work experience.(2) Completion of all education requirements.(3) Passage of the California law and ethics examination.SEC. 3. Section 4980.398 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 4980.399 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.399. (a) Each applicant and registrant shall obtain a passing score on a board-administered California law and ethics examination in order to qualify for licensure. The California law and ethics examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.(b) If an applicant fails the California law and ethics examination, they may retake the examination after any waiting period specified in regulation, upon payment of the required fees and submission of a reexamination application.(c) The board shall not issue a subsequent associate registration number unless the applicant has passed the California law and ethics examination no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for the subsequent associate registration number.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the seven-year age limit on the California law and ethics examination shall not apply to any application for initial license issuance or subsequent associate registration number received by the board on or before January 1, 2030.(e) A registrant shall complete a minimum of three hours of continuing education on the subject of California law and ethics during each renewal period to be eligible to renew their registration. The coursework shall be obtained from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as specified in Section 4980.54.SEC. 5. Section 4980.40 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.40. An applicant for licensure shall satisfy all of the following qualifications:(a) Meet the educational requirements of Section 4980.36 or both Sections 4980.37 and 4980.41, as applicable.(b) Be at least 18 years of age.(c) Have at least two years of supervised experience as specified in this chapter and its corresponding regulations.(d) Successfully pass a California law and ethics examination and a clinical examination, as specified in Section 4980.397. Each examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.(e) Not be subject to denial of licensure under Section 480. The board shall not issue a registration or license to any person who has been convicted of a crime in this or another state or in a territory of the United States that involves sexual abuse of children or who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code or the equivalent in another state or territory, in accordance with Section 480.SEC. 6. Section 4980.41 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.41. (a) An applicant for licensure whose education qualifies them under Section 4980.37 shall complete the following coursework or training in order to be eligible to sit for the clinical examination as specified in Section 4980.397:(1) A two semester or three quarter unit course in California law and professional ethics for marriage and family therapists, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas of study:(A) Contemporary professional ethics and statutory, regulatory, and decisional laws that delineate the profession’s scope of practice.(B) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of marriage and family therapy, including family law.(C) The current legal patterns and trends in the mental health profession.(D) The psychotherapist-patient privilege, confidentiality, the patient dangerous to self or others, and the treatment of minors with and without parental consent.(E) A recognition and exploration of the relationship between a practitioner’s sense of self and human values and their professional behavior and ethics.This course may be considered as part of the 48 semester or 72 quarter unit requirements contained in Section 4980.37.(2) A minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting as specified in Section 28 and any regulations promulgated thereunder.(3) A minimum of 10 contact hours of training or coursework in human sexuality as specified in Section 25, and any regulations promulgated thereunder. When coursework in a master’s or doctor’s degree program is acquired to satisfy this requirement, it shall be considered as part of the 48 semester or 72 quarter unit requirement contained in Section 4980.37.(4) For persons who began graduate study on or after January 1, 1986, a master’s or doctor’s degree qualifying for licensure shall include specific instruction in alcoholism and other chemical substance dependency as specified by regulation. When coursework in a master’s or doctor’s degree program is acquired to satisfy this requirement, it shall be considered as part of the 48 semester or 72 quarter unit requirement contained in Section 4980.37. Coursework required under this paragraph may be satisfactory if taken either in fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure or in a separate course. The applicant may satisfy this requirement by successfully completing this coursework from a master’s or doctoral degree program at an accredited or approved institution, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 4980.37, or from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as described in Section 4980.54.(5) For persons who began graduate study during the period commencing on January 1, 1995, and ending on December 31, 2003, a master’s or doctor’s degree qualifying for licensure shall include coursework in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention. For persons who began graduate study on or after January 1, 2004, a master’s or doctor’s degree qualifying for licensure shall include a minimum of 15 contact hours of coursework in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies, including knowledge of community resources, cultural factors, and same gender abuse dynamics. Coursework required under this paragraph may be satisfactory if taken either in fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure or in a separate course. The applicant may satisfy this requirement by successfully completing this coursework from a master’s or doctoral degree program at an accredited or approved institution, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 4980.37, or from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as described in Section 4980.54.(6) For persons who began graduate study on or after January 1, 2001, an applicant shall complete a minimum of a two semester or three quarter unit survey course in psychological testing. When coursework in a master’s or doctor’s degree program is acquired to satisfy this requirement, it may be considered as part of the 48 semester or 72 quarter unit requirement of Section 4980.37.(7) For persons who began graduate study on or after January 1, 2001, an applicant shall complete a minimum of a two semester or three quarter unit survey course in psychopharmacology. When coursework in a master’s or doctor’s degree program is acquired to satisfy this requirement, it may be considered as part of the 48 semester or 72 quarter unit requirement of Section 4980.37.(b) The requirements added by paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (a) are intended to improve the educational qualifications for licensure in order to better prepare future licentiates for practice and are not intended in any way to expand or restrict the scope of practice for licensed marriage and family therapists.SEC. 7. Section 4980.43 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.43. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all applicants shall have an active associate registration with the board in order to gain postdegree hours of supervised experience.(b) (1) Postdegree hours of experience gained before the issuance of an associate registration shall be credited toward licensure if all of the following apply:(A) The registration applicant applies for the associate registration and the board receives the application within 90 days of the granting of the qualifying master’s degree or doctoral degree.(B) For applicants completing graduate study on or after January 1, 2020, the experience is obtained at a workplace that, prior to the registration applicant gaining supervised experience hours, requires completed Live Scan fingerprinting. The applicant shall provide the board with a copy of that completed State of California “Request for Live Scan Service” form with the application for licensure.(C) The board subsequently grants the associate registration.(2) The applicant shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or a professional corporation until the applicant has been issued an associate registration by the board.(c) Supervised experience that is obtained for purposes of qualifying for licensure shall be related to the practice of marriage and family therapy and comply with the following:(1) A minimum of 3,000 hours completed during a period of at least 104 weeks.(2) A maximum of 40 hours in any seven consecutive days.(3) A minimum of 1,700 hours obtained after the qualifying master’s or doctoral degree was awarded.(4) A maximum of 1,300 hours obtained prior to the award date of the qualifying master’s or doctoral degree.(5) A maximum of 750 hours of counseling and direct supervisor contact prior to the award date of the qualifying master’s or doctoral degree.(6) Hours of experience shall not be gained prior to completing either 12 semester units or 18 quarter units of graduate instruction.(7) Hours of experience shall not have been gained more than seven years prior to the date the application for licensure was received by the board, except that up to 500 hours of clinical experience gained in the supervised practicum required by subdivision (c) of Section 4980.37 and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4980.36 shall be exempt from this seven-year requirement.(8) A minimum of 1,750 hours of direct clinical counseling with individuals, groups, couples, or families, that includes not less than 500 total hours of experience in diagnosing and treating couples, families, and children.(9) A maximum of 1,200 hours gained under the supervision of a licensed educational psychologist providing educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.(10) A maximum of 1,250 hours of nonclinical practice, consisting of direct supervisor contact, administering and evaluating psychological tests, writing clinical reports, writing progress or process notes, client-centered advocacy, and workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences directly related to marriage and family therapy that have been approved by the applicant’s supervisor.(11) It is anticipated and encouraged that hours of experience will include working with elders and dependent adults who have physical or mental limitations that restrict their ability to carry out normal activities or protect their rights.This subdivision shall only apply to hours gained on and after January 1, 2010.SEC. 8. Section 4980.44 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.4980.44.An associate marriage and family therapist employed under this chapter shall comply with the following requirements:(a)Inform each client or patient prior to performing any mental health and related services that the person is an unlicensed registered associate marriage and family therapist, provide the person’s registration number and the name of the person’s employer, and indicate whether the person is under the supervision of a licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed educational psychologist, or a licensed physician and surgeon certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.(b)(1)Any advertisement by or on behalf of a registered associate marriage and family therapist shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:(A)That the person is a registered associate marriage and family therapist.(B)The associate’s registration number.(C)The name of the person’s employer.(D)That the person is supervised by a licensed person.(2)The abbreviation “AMFT” shall not be used in an advertisement unless the title “registered associate marriage and family therapist” appears in the advertisement.SEC. 9. Section 4980.44 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4980.44. An applicant or registrant shall inform each client or patient before initiating any mental health and related services that the person is unlicensed and that they are under the supervision of a licensed professional and provide the name of their employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer.SEC. 10. Section 4980.48 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.48. (a) A trainee shall, prior to performing before initiating any professional services, inform each client or patient that the trainee is an unlicensed marriage and family therapist trainee, provide the name of the trainee’s employer, and indicate whether the trainee is under the supervision of a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed professional clinical counselor, a licensed psychologist, a licensed physician certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, or a licensed educational psychologist. unlicensed and that they are under the supervision of a licensed professional and provide the name of their employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer.(b)Any person that advertises services performed by a trainee shall include the trainee’s name, the supervisor’s license designation or abbreviation, and the supervisor’s license number. (c)(b) Any advertisement by or on behalf of a marriage and family therapist trainee shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:(1) The trainee’s name. (1)(2) That the trainee is a marriage and family therapist trainee.(2)(3) The name of the trainee’s employer. employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer.(3)(4) That the trainee is supervised by a licensed person.SEC. 8.SEC. 11. Section 4980.50 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4980.50. (a) Every applicant who meets the educational and experience requirements and applies for a license as a marriage and family therapist shall be examined by the board. The examinations shall be as set forth in Section 4980.397 and as specified in regulation. The examinations shall be given at least twice a year at a time and place and under supervision as the board may determine. The board shall examine the candidate with regard to the candidate’s knowledge and professional skills and judgment in the utilization of appropriate techniques and methods.(b) The board shall not deny any applicant who has submitted a complete application for examination admission to the licensure examinations required by this section if the applicant meets the educational and experience requirements of this chapter and has not committed any acts or engaged in any conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.(c) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the clinical examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s clinical examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.(d) If an applicant for examination who has passed the California law and ethics examination is the subject of a complaint or is under board investigation for acts or conduct that, if proven to be true, would constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure, the board shall permit the applicant to take the clinical examination for licensure, but may notify the applicant that licensure will not be granted pending completion of the investigation.(e) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed either the California law and ethics examination or the clinical examination permission to retake either examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaints against the applicant. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been filed against the applicant pursuant to Sections 11503 and 11504 of the Government Code, respectively, or the applicant has been denied in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 485.(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years following the date of an examination.(g) The clinical examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.(h) An applicant for licensure who has qualified pursuant to this chapter shall be issued a license as a marriage and family therapist in the form that the board deems appropriate.SEC. 9.SEC. 12. Section 4984.01 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4984.01. (a) The associate marriage and family therapist registration shall expire one year from the last day of the month in which it was issued.(b) To renew the registration, subject to the additional limitations imposed by subdivision (d), the registrant shall, on or before the expiration date of the registration, complete all of the following actions:(1) Apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.(2) Pay a renewal fee prescribed by the board.(3) Notify the board whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, and whether any disciplinary action has been taken against them by a regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state subsequent to the last renewal of the registration.(4) Certify under penalty of perjury their compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4980.54.(c) An expired registration may be renewed by completing all of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b).(d) The registration may be renewed a maximum of six times. No registration shall be renewed or reinstated beyond seven years from the last day of the month during which it was issued, regardless of whether it has been revoked. When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and obtain a subsequent associate registration number if the applicant meets the educational requirements for a subsequent associate registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for the subsequent associate registration number.(e) An applicant who is issued a subsequent associate registration number pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), an applicant applying for or who currently holds a subsequent associate registration number may request that the board grant them a one-time, two-consecutive-year hardship extension to allow them to be employed or volunteer at one private practice or professional corporation employer with their subsequent associate registration number in accordance with the following:(1) An associate shall not be issued more than one extension.(2) The extension is only valid for the one private practice or professional corporation employer for which it is requested.(3) Work for the employer shall not commence or continue until the extension is approved by the board.(4) The application shall be jointly signed under penalty of perjury and dated by the associate, the supervisor, and, if the supervisor is not employed by the supervisee’s employer or is a volunteer, a representative of the employer.(5) The board shall grant the extension provided that the application is signed, all information required is provided, and good cause is demonstrated. The application shall contain all of the following:(A) The date the extension is needed to commence or continue work for the employer.(B) The name of the employer where the associate will be gaining hours.(C) An attestation that the employer is a private practice or a professional corporation.(D) The name, license type, and license number of the current supervisor.(E) A showing of good cause for the applicant being unable to complete the licensure process within seven years. Good cause may include, but is not limited to, extended medical leave, family caregiving responsibilities, difficulties finding employment, or circumstances beyond the applicant’s control.(F) A description of the plan for the associate to gain the needed hours toward licensure during the two-year extension period.SEC. 10.SEC. 13. Section 4984.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4984.7. The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of marriage and family therapists:(a) The application fee for an associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(b) The annual renewal fee for an associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(c) The fee for the application for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).(d) (1) (A) The fee for the board-administered clinical examination, if the board chooses to adopt this examination in regulations, shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500). If the board chooses to adopt an examination administered by a public or private organization, as specified by the board in regulations, then the examination fee shall be determined by, and paid directly to, that organization.(B) The fee for the California law and ethics examination shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(2) An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, after having been scheduled to take the examination, shall forfeit the examination fee.(3) The amount of the examination fees shall be based on the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading each examination and the actual cost to the board of administering each examination. The examination fees shall be adjusted periodically by regulation to reflect the actual costs incurred by the board.(e) The fee for the issuance of an initial license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(f) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(g) The renewal delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire is subject to the delinquency fee.(h) The fee for issuance of a replacement registration, license, or certificate shall be twenty dollars ($20).(i) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).(j) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).SEC. 11.SEC. 14. Section 4984.72 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4984.72. An applicant who fails the clinical examination may, within one year from the notification date of that failure, retake the examination as regularly scheduled without further application upon payment of the fee for the examination. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until they file a new application, meet all requirements in effect on the date of application, and pay all required fees.SEC. 12.SEC. 15. Section 4989.20 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4989.20. (a) The board may issue a license as an educational psychologist if the applicant satisfies, with proof satisfactory to the board, the following requirements:(1) Possession of, at minimum, a master’s degree in psychology, educational psychology, school psychology, counseling and guidance, or a degree deemed equivalent by the board. This degree shall be obtained from an educational institution approved by the board according to the regulations adopted under this chapter.(2) Attainment of 18 years of age.(3) Is not subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.(4) Successful completion of 60 semester units or 90 quarter units of postgraduate study in pupil personnel services.(5) Two school terms of full-time, or the equivalent to full-time, experience as a licensed or credentialed school psychologist in the public schools or in another school setting as specified in regulations. The experience shall be gained over a period of at least two school terms. The applicant shall not be credited with experience obtained more than seven years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.(6) If the experience required by paragraph (5) was completed while holding a California credential in a school located in California, completion of one of the following:(A) A minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised professional experience in an accredited school psychology program.(B) One school term of full-time, or the equivalent to full-time, experience as a California credentialed school psychologist in the California public schools, or in another school setting as specified in regulations, obtained under the direction of a California-licensed educational psychologist. The experience shall be gained over a period of at least one school term. The applicant shall not be credited with experience obtained more than seven years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.(7) If the experience required by paragraph (5) was not completed while holding a California credential in a school located in California, completion of one of the following:(A) A minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised professional experience gained in California in an accredited school psychology program, gained no more than seven years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.(B) One school term of full-time, or the equivalent to full-time, experience as a California credentialed school psychologist in the California public schools, or in another school setting as specified in regulations, obtained under the direction of a California licensed educational psychologist. The experience shall be gained over a period of at least one school term. The applicant shall not be credited with experience obtained more than seven years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.(8) Passage of the licensed educational psychologist written examination administered by the board. This examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Full time” means the days or hours of creditable service the employer requires to be performed by the employee in a school term under their collective bargaining agreement or employment agreement. It shall consist of a minimum of 175 days, or 1,050 hours, per school term.(2) “Equivalent to full time” means the days or hours of creditable service that a person who is employed on a part-time basis would be required to perform in a school term if they were employed full time in that part-time position.(3) “School term” means a minimum period of 35 weeks beginning the first day and ending the last day creditable service is required to be performed by a member employed on a full-time basis, excluding any period that has been excluded pursuant to a publicly available written contractual agreement. The school term shall also be the same for an individual who is not employed on a full-time basis who is performing the same duties as a member employed on a full-time basis.SEC. 13.SEC. 16. Section 4989.68 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4989.68. The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of educational psychologists:(a) The application fee for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).(b) The fee for issuance of the initial license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(c) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(d) The delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire shall be subject to the delinquency fee.(e) The written examination fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500). An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, once having been scheduled, shall forfeit any examination fees they paid.(f) The fee for issuance of a replacement registration, license, or certificate shall be twenty dollars ($20).(g) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).(h) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).SEC. 14.SEC. 17. Section 4992.05 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4992.05. (a) A registrant or an applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall pass the following two examinations as prescribed by the board:(1) A California law and ethics examination.(2) A clinical examination.(b) The board shall grant eligibility to take the California law and ethics examination upon approval of an application for registration or an application for licensure, and submission of the required application and fee.(c) The board may grant an applicant for licensure eligibility to take the clinical examination only upon meeting all of the following requirements:(1) Completion of all education requirements.(2) Passage of the California law and ethics examination.(3) Completion of all required supervised work experience.SEC. 15.SEC. 18. Section 4992.07 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 16.SEC. 19. Section 4992.09 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4992.09. (a) Each applicant and registrant shall obtain a passing score on a board-administered California law and ethics examination in order to qualify for licensure. The California law and ethics examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.(b) If an applicant fails the California law and ethics examination, they may retake the examination after any waiting period as specified in regulation, upon payment of the required fees and submission of a reexamination application.(c) The board shall not issue a subsequent associate registration number unless the applicant has passed the California law and ethics examination no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for the subsequent associate registration number.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the seven-year age limit on the California law and ethics examination shall not apply to any application for initial license issuance or subsequent associate registration number received by the board on or before January 1, 2030.(e) A registrant shall complete a minimum of three hours of continuing education on the subject of California law and ethics during each renewal period to be eligible to renew their registration. The coursework shall be obtained from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as specified in Section 4996.22.SEC. 17.SEC. 20. Section 4992.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4992.1. (a) Only individuals who have the qualifications prescribed by the board under this chapter are eligible to take an examination under this chapter.(b) Every applicant who is issued a clinical social worker license shall be examined by the board.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years following the date of an examination.(d) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the clinical examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s clinical examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.(e) If an applicant for examination who has passed the California law and ethics examination is the subject of a complaint or is under board investigation for acts or conduct that, if proven to be true, would constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure, the board shall permit the applicant to take the clinical examination for licensure, but may notify the applicant that licensure will not be granted pending completion of the investigation.(f) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed either the California law and ethics examination or the clinical examination permission to retake either examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaint against the applicant. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been filed against the applicant pursuant to Section 11503 or 11504 of the Government Code, or the applicant has been denied in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 485.(g) The clinical examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.SEC. 18.SEC. 21. Section 4996.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.1. The board shall issue a clinical social worker license to each applicant who qualifies pursuant to this article and who successfully passes a California law and ethics examination and a clinical examination. Each examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.SEC. 19.SEC. 22. Section 4996.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.3. The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of clinical social workers:(a) The application fee for registration as an associate clinical social worker shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(b) The fee for annual renewal of an associate clinical social worker registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(c) The fee for application for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).(d) (1) (A) The fee for the board-administered clinical examination, if the board chooses to adopt this examination in regulations, shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).(B) The fee for the California law and ethics examination shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(2) An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, after having been scheduled to take the examination, shall forfeit the examination fees.(3) The amount of the examination fees shall be based on the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading each examination and the actual cost to the board of administering each examination. The written examination fees shall be adjusted periodically by regulation to reflect the actual costs incurred by the board.(e) The fee for issuance of an initial license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(f) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(g) The renewal delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire shall be subject to the delinquency fee.(h) The fee for issuance of a replacement registration, license, or certificate shall be twenty dollars ($20).(i) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).(j) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).SEC. 20.SEC. 23. Section 4996.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.4. An applicant who fails the clinical examination may, within one year from the notification date of failure, retake that examination as regularly scheduled, without further application, upon payment of the required examination fees. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until they file a new application, meet all current requirements, and pay all required fees.SEC. 21.SEC. 24. Section 4996.13 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.13. (a) Nothing in this article chapter shall prevent qualified members of other professional groups from doing work of a psychosocial nature consistent with the standards, ethics, and scope of practice of their respective professions. However, these qualified members shall not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “clinical social worker,” and shall not state or imply that they are licensed or registered to practice clinical social work. These qualified members of other professional groups include, but are not limited to, the following:(1) A physician and surgeon certified pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000).(2) A registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700). (3) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).(4) Members of the State Bar.(5) Marriage and family therapists licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980).(6) Educational psychologists licensed pursuant to Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 4989.10). (7) Licensed professional clinical counselors pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10).(b) This article shall not apply to any priest, rabbi, imam, minister of the gospel, or other religious official of any denomination when providing faith-based counseling services as part of their regular professional duties for an established and legally recognizable faith-based entity, such as a church, synagogue, mosque, or other recognized religious organization, provided that all of the following criteria are met:(1) The services are performed solely under the direct auspices of that faith-based entity.(2) A separate fee, beyond their customary compensation from that faith-based entity, is not charged or received.(3) They do not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “psychosocial,” “psychotherapy,” or “clinical social worker,” and shall not state or imply that they are licensed or registered to practice clinical social work.(4) The services provided are limited to counseling services provided in a religious or spiritual context and do not involve the diagnosis or treatment of mental health disorders.SEC. 25. Section 4996.15 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.15. (a) Nothing in this article shall restrict or prevent psychosocial activities by employees of accredited academic institutions, public schools, government agencies, or nonprofit institutions who train graduate students pursuing a master’s degree in social work in an accredited college or university. Any psychosocial activities by the employee shall be part of a supervised course of study and the graduate students shall be designated by titles such as social work interns, social work trainees, or other titles clearly indicating the training status appropriate to their level of training. The term “social work intern,” however, shall be reserved for persons enrolled in a master’s or doctoral training program in social work in an accredited school or department of social work.(b) A person practicing pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, before initiating any professional services, inform each client or patient that they are unlicensed and that they are under supervision and provide the name of their employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer. (b)(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a graduate student shall not perform clinical social work in a private practice or a professional corporation.SEC. 26. Section 4996.18 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.18. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4996.23, an applicant shall have an active registration with the board as an associate clinical social worker in order to gain hours of supervised experience. The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the board.(b) An applicant for registration shall satisfy the following requirements:(1) Possess a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work.(2) Not be subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.(3) Have completed training or coursework, which may be embedded within more than one course, in California law and professional ethics for clinical social workers. The coursework shall be taken from an accredited school or department of social work, a school, college, or university accredited by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education, a school, college, or university that is approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, or from a continuing education provider that is acceptable to the board, as defined in Section 4996.22. Undergraduate coursework shall not satisfy this requirement. The coursework shall include instruction in all of the following areas of study:(A) Contemporary professional ethics and statutes, regulations, and court decisions that delineate the scope of practice of clinical social work.(B) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of clinical social work, including, but not limited to, family law.(C) The current legal patterns and trends in the mental health professions.(D) The psychotherapist-patient privilege, confidentiality, dangerous patients, and the treatment of minors with and without parental consent.(E) A recognition and exploration of the relationship between a practitioner’s sense of self and human values, and the practitioner’s professional behavior and ethics.(F) The application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings.(G) Licensing law and process.(c) An applicant who possesses a master’s degree from a school or department of social work that is a candidate for accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education shall be eligible, and, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4996.23, shall be required to register as an associate clinical social worker in order to gain experience toward licensure if the applicant is not subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480. That applicant shall not, however, be eligible to take the clinical examination until the school or department of social work has received accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education.(d) An applicant who possesses a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work shall be able to apply experience the applicant obtained during the time the accredited school or department was in candidacy status by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education toward the licensure requirements, if the experience meets the requirements of Section 4996.23. This subdivision shall apply retroactively to persons who possess a master’s degree from an accredited school or department of social work and who obtained experience during the time the accredited school or department was in candidacy status by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education.(e) An applicant for registration or licensure trained in an educational institution outside the United States shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant possesses a master’s of social work degree that is equivalent to a master’s degree issued from a school or department of social work that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education. These applicants shall provide the board with a comprehensive evaluation of the degree and shall provide any other documentation the board deems necessary. The board has the authority to make the final determination as to whether a degree meets all requirements, including, but not limited to, course requirements regardless of evaluation or accreditation.(f) All applicants for licensure and registrants shall be at all times under the supervision of a supervisor who shall be responsible for ensuring that the extent, kind, and quality of counseling performed is consistent with the training and experience of the person being supervised and who shall be responsible to the board for compliance with all laws governing the practice of clinical social work.(g) All applicants and registrants An applicant or registrant shall inform each client or patient before performing initiating any professional services that the applicant or registrant is unlicensed and is under the supervision of a licensed professional. professional and provide the name of their employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer.SEC. 22.SEC. 27. Section 4996.23 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.23. (a) To qualify for licensure, each applicant shall complete 3,000 hours of post-master’s degree supervised experience related to the practice of clinical social work. Except as provided in subdivision (b), experience shall not be gained until the applicant is registered as an associate clinical social worker.(b) Postdegree hours of experience gained before the issuance of an associate registration shall be credited toward licensure if all of the following apply:(1) The registration applicant applies for the associate registration and the board receives the application within 90 days of the granting of the qualifying master’s or doctoral degree.(2) For applicants completing graduate study on or after January 1, 2020, the experience is obtained at a workplace that, prior to the registration applicant gaining supervised experience hours, requires completed Live Scan fingerprinting. The applicant shall provide the board with a copy of that completed “State of California Request for Live Scan Service” form with the application for licensure.(3) The board subsequently grants the associate registration.(c) The applicant shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or a professional corporation until the applicant has been issued an associate registration by the board.(d) The experience shall be as follows:(1) (A) At least 1,700 hours shall be gained under the supervision of a licensed clinical social worker. The remaining required supervised experience may be gained under the supervision of a physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed educational psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker.(B) A maximum of 1,200 hours gained under the supervision of a licensed educational psychologist providing educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.(2) A minimum of 2,000 hours in clinical psychosocial diagnosis, assessment, and treatment, including psychotherapy or counseling; however, at least 750 hours shall be face-to-face individual or group psychotherapy provided in the context of clinical social work services.(3) A maximum of 1,000 hours in client-centered advocacy, consultation, evaluation, research, direct supervisor contact, and workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences directly related to clinical social work that have been approved by the applicant’s supervisor.(4) A minimum of two years of supervised experience is required to be obtained over a period of not less than 104 weeks and shall have been gained within the seven years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.(5) No more than 40 hours of experience may be credited in any seven consecutive days.(6) For hours gained on or after January 1, 2010, no more than six hours of supervision, whether individual, triadic, or group supervision, shall be credited during any single week.SEC. 23.SEC. 28. Section 4996.28 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4996.28. (a) Registration as an associate clinical social worker shall expire one year from the last day of the month during which it was issued. To renew a registration, subject to the additional limitations imposed by subdivision (c), the registrant shall, on or before the expiration date of the registration, complete all of the following actions:(1) Apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.(2) Pay a renewal fee prescribed by the board.(3) Notify the board whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, and whether any disciplinary action has been taken by a regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the last renewal of the registration. (4) Certify under penalty of perjury their compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4996.22.(b) An expired registration may be renewed by completing all of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a).(c) A registration as an associate clinical social worker may be renewed a maximum of six times. No registration shall be renewed or reinstated beyond seven years from the last day of the month during which the registration was issued, regardless of whether the registration has been revoked. When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and obtain a subsequent associate clinical social worker registration number if the applicant meets all requirements for registration in effect at the time of their application for a subsequent associate clinical social worker registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination pursuant to Section 4992.09 no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for the subsequent associate registration number.(d) An applicant issued a subsequent associate registration number pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), an applicant applying for or who currently holds a subsequent associate registration number may request that the board grant them a one-time, two-consecutive-year hardship extension to allow them to be employed or volunteer at one private practice or professional corporation employer with their subsequent associate registration number in accordance with the following:(1) An associate shall not be issued more than one extension.(2) The extension is only valid for the one private practice or professional corporation employer for which it is requested.(3) Work for the employer shall not commence or continue until the extension is approved by the board.(4) The application shall be jointly signed under penalty of perjury and dated by the associate, the supervisor, and, if the supervisor is not employed by the supervisee’s employer or is a volunteer, a representative of the employer.(5) The board shall grant the extension provided that the application is signed, all information required is provided, and good cause is demonstrated. The application shall contain all of the following:(A) The date the extension is needed to commence or continue work for the employer.(B) The name of the employer where the associate will be gaining hours.(C) An attestation that the employer is a private practice or a professional corporation.(D) The name, license type, and license number of the current supervisor.(E) A showing of good cause for the applicant being unable to complete the licensure process within seven years. Good cause may include, but is not limited to, extended medical leave, family caregiving responsibilities, difficulties finding employment, or circumstances beyond the applicant’s control.(F) A description of the plan for the associate to gain the needed hours toward licensure during the two-year extension period.SEC. 24.SEC. 29. Section 4999.22 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.22. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent qualified members of the other professional groups from doing work of a psychosocial nature consistent with the standards, ethics, and scope of practice of their respective professions. However, these qualified members shall not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “professional clinical counselor” and shall not state that they are licensed or registered to practice professional clinical counseling. These qualified members of other professional groups include, but are not limited to, the following:(1) A physician and surgeon certified pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000).(2) A registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700).(3) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).(4) Members of the State Bar.(5) Marriage and family therapists licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980).(6) Educational psychologists licensed pursuant to Chapter 13.5 (commencing with Section 4989.10).(7) Clinical social workers licensed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991).(b) This chapter shall not be construed to constrict, limit, or withdraw the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)), the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991)), the Nursing Practice Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700)), the Psychology Licensing Law (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900)), or the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Act (Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980)).(c) This chapter shall not apply to any person who is admitted to practice law in this state, or who is licensed to practice medicine, who provides counseling services as part of their professional practice. (d) This chapter shall not apply to any priest, rabbi, imam, minister of the gospel, or other religious official of any denomination when providing faith-based counseling services as part of their regular professional duties for an established and legally recognizable faith-based entity, such as a church, synagogue, mosque, or other recognized religious organization, provided that all of the following criteria are met:(1) The services are performed solely under the direct auspices of that faith-based entity.(2) A separate fee, beyond their customary compensation from that faith-based entity, is not charged or received.(3) They do not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “psychosocial,” “psychotherapy,” or “professional clinical counselor,” and shall not state or imply that they are licensed or registered to practice professional clinical counseling.(4) The services provided are limited to counseling services provided in a religious or spiritual context and do not involve the diagnosis or treatment of mental health disorders.(e) This chapter shall not apply to an unlicensed or unregistered employee or volunteer working in a governmental entity, a school, a college, a university, or an institution that is both nonprofit and charitable, if both of the following apply:(1) The work of the employee or volunteer is performed under the oversight and direction of the entity.(2) (A) On and after July 1, 2020, the employee or volunteer provides a client, prior to initiating psychotherapy services or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, a notice written in at least 12-point type that is in substantially the following form:NOTICE TO CLIENTSThe (Name of office or unit) of the (Name of agency) receives and responds to complaints regarding the practice of psychotherapy by any unlicensed or unregistered practitioner providing services at (Name of agency). To file a complaint, contact (Telephone number, email address, internet website, or mailing address of agency).The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided by individuals licensed and registered by the board. If you have a complaint and are unsure if your practitioner is licensed or registered, please contact the Board of Behavioral Sciences at 916-574-7830 for assistance or utilize the board’s online license verification feature by visiting www.bbs.ca.gov.(B) The delivery of the notice described in subparagraph (A) to the client shall be documented.(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (d) and (e), all persons registered as associates or licensed under this chapter shall not be exempt from this chapter or the jurisdiction of the board.SEC. 30. Section 4999.36 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.36. (a) A clinical counselor trainee may perform activities and services provided that the activities and services constitute part of the clinical counselor trainee’s supervised course of study and that the person is designated by the title “clinical counselor trainee.”(b) All practicum and field study hours gained as a clinical counselor trainee shall be coordinated between the school and the site where hours are being accrued. The school shall approve each site and shall have a written agreement with each site that details each party’s responsibilities, including the methods by which supervision shall be provided. The agreement shall provide for regular progress reports and evaluations of the student’s performance at the site.(c) If an applicant has gained practicum and field study hours while enrolled in an institution other than the one that confers the qualifying degree, it shall be the applicant’s responsibility to provide to the board satisfactory evidence that those practicum and field study hours were gained in compliance with this section.(d) A clinical counselor trainee shall inform each client or patient, prior to performing initiating any professional services, that he or she is they are unlicensed and under supervision. supervision and provide the name of their employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer.(e) No hours earned while a clinical counselor trainee may count toward the 3,000 hours of required postdegree supervised experience.SEC. 25.SEC. 31. Section 4999.46 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.46. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all applicants shall have an active associate registration with the board in order to gain postdegree hours of supervised experience. An associate or applicant for licensure shall be under the supervision of a supervisor at all times. An associate shall inform each client, before performing any professional services, that the associate is unlicensed and under supervision.(b) (1) Postdegree hours of experience gained before the issuance of an associate registration shall be credited toward licensure if all of the following apply:(A) The registration applicant applies for the associate registration and the board receives the application within 90 days of the granting of the qualifying master’s degree or doctoral degree.(B) For applicants completing graduate study on or after January 1, 2020, the experience is obtained at a workplace that, prior to the registration applicant gaining supervised experience hours, requires completed Live Scan fingerprinting. The applicant shall provide the board with a copy of that completed State of California “Request for Live Scan Service” form with their application for licensure.(C) The board subsequently grants the associate registration.(2) The applicant shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or a professional corporation until they have been issued an associate registration by the board.(c) Supervised experience that is obtained for the purposes of qualifying for licensure shall be related to the practice of professional clinical counseling and comply with the following:(1) A minimum of 3,000 postdegree hours performed over a period of not less than two years (104 weeks).(2) Not more than 40 hours in any seven consecutive days.(3) Not less than 1,750 hours of direct clinical counseling with individuals, groups, couples, or families using a variety of psychotherapeutic techniques and recognized counseling interventions.(4) A maximum of 1,250 hours of nonclinical practice, consisting of direct supervisor contact, administering and evaluating psychological tests, writing clinical reports, writing progress or process notes, client-centered advocacy, and workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences directly related to professional clinical counseling that have been approved by the applicant’s supervisor.(5) A maximum of 1,200 hours gained under the supervision of a licensed educational psychologist providing educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.(d) Experience hours shall not have been gained more than seven years prior to the date the application for licensure was received by the board.SEC. 26.SEC. 32. Section 4999.46.1 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 33. Section 4999.46.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4999.46.1. An applicant or registrant shall inform each client or patient before initiating any professional services that the applicant or registrant is unlicensed and that they are under the supervision of a licensed professional and provide the name of their employer or, if not employed, the name of the entity for which they volunteer.SEC. 27.SEC. 34. Section 4999.50 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.50. (a) The board may issue a professional clinical counselor license to any person who meets all of the following requirements:(1) They have received a master’s or doctoral degree described in Section 4999.32 or 4999.33, as applicable.(2) They have completed at least 3,000 hours of supervised experience in the practice of professional clinical counseling.(3) They provide evidence of a passing score, as determined by the board, on the examinations designated in Section 4999.53. Each examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.(b) An applicant for licensure who has satisfied the requirements of this chapter shall be issued a license as a professional clinical counselor.SEC. 28.SEC. 35. Section 4999.52 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.52. (a) Every applicant for a license as a professional clinical counselor shall take one or more examinations, as determined by the board, to ascertain their knowledge, professional skills, and judgment in the utilization of appropriate techniques and methods of professional clinical counseling.(b) The examinations shall be given at least twice a year at a time and place and under supervision as the board may determine.(c) The board shall not deny any applicant admission to an examination who has submitted a complete application for examination admission if the applicant meets the educational and experience requirements of this chapter and has not committed any acts or engaged in any conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.(d) The board shall not deny any applicant, whose application for licensure is complete, admission to the clinical examination, nor shall the board postpone or delay any applicant’s clinical examination, solely upon the receipt by the board of a complaint alleging acts or conduct that would constitute grounds to deny licensure.(e) If an applicant for the examination specified by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53, who has passed the California law and ethics examination, is the subject of a complaint or is under board investigation for acts or conduct that, if proven to be true, would constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure, the board shall permit the applicant to take this examination, but may notify the applicant that licensure will not be granted pending completion of the investigation.(f) Notwithstanding Section 135, the board may deny any applicant who has previously failed either the California law and ethics examination, or the examination specified by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53, permission to retake either examination pending completion of the investigation of any complaints against the applicant.(g) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from denying an applicant admission to any examination or refusing to issue a license to any applicant when an accusation or statement of issues has been filed against the applicant pursuant to Section 11503 or 11504 of the Government Code, respectively, or the application has been denied in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 485.(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may destroy all examination materials two years following the date of an examination.(i) The clinical examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance.SEC. 29.SEC. 36. Section 4999.53 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.53. (a) A registrant or an applicant for licensure as a professional clinical counselor shall pass the following examinations as prescribed by the board:(1) A California law and ethics examination.(2) A clinical examination administered by the board, or the National Clinical Mental Health Counselor Examination if the board finds that this examination meets the prevailing standards for validation and use of the licensing and certification tests in California.(b) The board shall grant eligibility to take the California law and ethics examination upon approval of an application for registration or an application for licensure and submission of the required application and fee.(c) The board may grant an applicant for licensure eligibility to take the clinical examination or the National Clinical Mental Health Counselor Examination, as established by the board through regulation, only upon meeting all of the following requirements:(1) Completion of all required supervised work experience.(2) Completion of all education requirements.(3) Passage of the California law and ethics examination.SEC. 30.SEC. 37. Section 4999.55 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.55. (a) Each applicant and registrant shall obtain a passing score on a board-administered California law and ethics examination in order to qualify for licensure. The California law and ethics examination shall be passed no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for initial license issuance. (b) If an applicant fails the California law and ethics examination, they may retake the examination after any waiting period as specified in regulation upon payment of the required fees and submission of a reexamination application.(c) The board shall not issue a subsequent associate registration number unless the applicant has passed the California law and ethics examination no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for the subsequent associate registration number.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the seven-year age limit on the California law and ethics examination shall not apply to any application for initial license issuance or subsequent associate registration number received by the board on or before January 1, 2030.(e) A registrant shall complete a minimum of three hours of continuing education on the subject of California law and ethics during each renewal period in order to be eligible to renew their registration. The coursework shall be obtained from a board-accepted provider of continuing education, as specified in Section 4999.76.SEC. 31.SEC. 38. Section 4999.64 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.64. An applicant who fails the examination specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.53 may, within one year from the notification date of that failure, retake the examination as regularly scheduled without further application upon payment of the fee for the examination. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until they file a new application, meet all requirements in effect on the date of application, and pay all required fees.SEC. 32.SEC. 39. Section 4999.100 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.100. (a) An associate registration shall expire one year from the last day of the month in which it was issued.(b) To renew a registration subject to the additional limitations imposed by subdivision (d), the registrant, on or before the expiration date of the registration, shall do the following:(1) Apply for a renewal on a form prescribed by the board.(2) Pay a renewal fee prescribed by the board.(3) Notify the board whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the registrant’s last renewal. (4) Certify under penalty of perjury their compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4999.76.(c) An expired registration may be renewed by completing all of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b).(d) The associate registration may be renewed a maximum of six times. Registration shall not be renewed or reinstated beyond seven years from the last day of the month during which it was issued, regardless of whether it has been revoked. When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and obtain a subsequent associate registration number if the applicant meets the educational requirements for a subsequent associate registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination described in Section 4999.53 no more than seven years prior to the board’s receipt of the application for the subsequent registration number.(e) An applicant who is issued a subsequent associate registration number pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), an applicant applying for or who currently holds a subsequent associate registration number may request that the board grant them a one-time, two-consecutive-year hardship extension to allow them to be employed or volunteer at one private practice or professional corporation employer with their subsequent associate registration number in accordance with the following:(1) An associate shall not be issued more than one extension.(2) The extension is only valid for the one private practice or professional corporation employer for which it is requested.(3) Work for the employer shall not commence or continue until the extension is approved by the board.(4) The application shall be jointly signed under penalty of perjury and dated by the associate, the supervisor, and, if the supervisor is not employed by the supervisee’s employer or is a volunteer, a representative of the employer.(5) The board shall grant the extension provided that the application is signed, all information required is provided, and good cause is demonstrated. The application shall contain all of the following:(A) The date the extension is needed to commence or continue work for the employer.(B) The name of the employer where the associate will be gaining hours.(C) An attestation that the employer is a private practice or a professional corporation.(D) The name, license type, and license number of the current supervisor.(E) A showing of good cause for the applicant being unable to complete the licensure process within seven years. Good cause may include, but is not limited to, extended medical leave, family caregiving responsibilities, difficulties finding employment, or circumstances beyond the applicant’s control.(F) A description of the plan for the associate to gain the needed hours toward licensure during the two-year extension period.SEC. 33.SEC. 40. Section 4999.120 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4999.120. The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of professional clinical counselors:(a) The fee for the application for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).(b) The fee for the application for associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(c) (1) (A) The fee for the board-administered clinical examination, if the board chooses to adopt this examination in regulations, shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).(B) The fee for the California law and ethics examination shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(2) An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, after having been scheduled to take the examination, shall forfeit the examination fees.(3) The amount of the examination fees shall be based on the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading each examination and the actual cost to the board of administering each examination. The written examination fees shall be adjusted periodically by regulation to reflect the actual costs incurred by the board.(d) The fee for the issuance of a license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(e) The fee for the annual renewal of an associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).(f) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).(g) The renewal delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire shall be subject to the delinquency fee.(h) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40). (i) The fee for issuance of a replacement license or registration shall be twenty dollars ($20).(j) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).SEC. 34.SEC. 41. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.